Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.055

Child support liens.

Child support debts, not paid when due, become liens by operation of law against all property of the debtor with priority of a secured creditor. This lien shall be separate and apart from, and in addition to, any other lien created by, or provided for, in this title. The lien attaches to all real and personal property of the debtor on the date of filing with the county auditor of the county in which the property is located. Liens filed by other states or jurisdictions that comply with the procedural rules for filing liens under chapter 65.04 RCW shall be accorded full faith and credit and are enforceable without judicial notice or hearing.

[ 2000 c 86 s 1; 1997 c 58 s 942.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.